Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 9. PUBLIC SECURITIES

SUBTITLE D. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SECURITIES ISSUED BY COUNTIES

CHAPTER 1303. OTHER USE OF COUNTY BOND PROCEEDS

Sec. 1303.001. USE OF BOND PROCEEDS FOR OWNER-CONTROLLED INSURANCE PROGRAM. A county may use the proceeds of bonds or certificates of obligation issued to pay for a county construction project to pay for an owner-controlled insurance program under which the county establishes and administers a consolidated insurance program for the project if the county's order authorizing the issuance of the bonds or other certificates of obligation authorizes the establishment of the program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 564, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.